West Virginia, session 2026, HB5103.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 13. Medication-Assisted Treatment Program Licensing Act. §16B-13-7. Inspection; inspection warrant. (a) The Office of Health Facility Licensure and Certification shall inspect each opioid treatment program annually, including a review of the patient records, to ensure that the program complies with this article and the applicable rules.  A pharmacist, employed or contracted by the director, licensed in this state, and a law-enforcement officer may be present at each inspection.(b) The Office of Health Facility Licensure and Certification shall perform unannounced complaint and verification inspections at office-based medication-assisted treatment programs, including a review of the patient records, to ensure that the program complies with this article and the applicable rules.  In addition to the unannounced complaint and verification inspections, office-based medication-assisted treatment programs shall be subject to formal inspections at least once every 24 months and shall include a review of the patient records to ensure that the program complies with this article and the applicable rules. A pharmacist, employed or contracted by the Inspector General, licensed in this state and a law-enforcement officer may be present at each inspection.(c) During an onsite inspection, the inspectors shall make a reasonable attempt to discuss each violation with the medical director or other owners of the medication-assisted treatment program before issuing a formal written notification.(d) Any action taken to correct a violation shall be documented in writing by the medical director or other owners of the medication-assisted treatment program and may be verified by follow-up visits by the Office of Health Facility Licensure and Certification.(e) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the Inspector General may, in the manner provided by law, maintain an action in the name of the state for an inspection warrant against any person, partnership, association, or corporation to allow any inspection or seizure of records in order to complete any inspection allowed by this article or the rules promulgated pursuant to this article, or to meet any other purpose of this article or the rules promulgated pursuant to this article.(f) When possible, inspections for annual certification and licensure by the medication-assisted treatment programs will be done consecutively or concurrently.  However, this provision does not limit the ability to conduct unannounced inspections pursuant to a complaint.